Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 14 Remedy for Violation of Constitutional Rights

Chapter applicable to double jeopardy claims. —

Prisoner's double jeopardy claim should have been asserted through a petition for post-conviction relief pursuant to this chapter, and invoking Rule 35(a), W.R. Cr. P., by a motion for correction of an illegal sentence was an inefficacious method of seeking relief. DeSpain v. State, 865 P.2d 584,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1993).

Consolidated petition for post-conviction relief and habeas corpus,

filed in the district court of the county of trial and dismissed by the trial judge, was treated by the supreme court as a petition for post-conviction relief for the following reasons: (1) the court's judgment could not be impeached by a writ of habeas corpus; (2) the court in habeas corpus was not authorized to grant a new trial; (3) all issues which could have been raised in a habeas proceeding were raised in the petition for post-conviction relief; and (4) no appeal lay from the denial of the habeas petition. State ex rel. Hopkinson v. District Court, 696 P.2d 54,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 455

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 474 U.S. 865, 106 S. Ct. 187, 88 L. Ed. 2d 155, 1985 U.S. LEXIS 4988 (U.S. 1985).

Cited

in

Escobedo v. State, 601 P.2d 1028,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 499

(Wyo. 1979); Hamill v. Ferguson, 937 F. Supp. 1517, 1996 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 17115 (D. Wyo. 1996).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Post Conviction Relief: Do It Once, Do It Right and Be Done With It,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 473 (1989).

§ 7-14-101.
Definition of “this act”; commencement and conduct of proceedings.

As used in W.S.

7-14-101

through

7-14-108

“this act” means W.S.

7-14-101

through

7-14-108

.

Any person serving a felony sentence in a state penal institution who asserts that in the proceedings which resulted in his conviction or sentence there was a substantial denial of his rights under the constitution of the United States or of the state of Wyoming, or both, may institute proceedings under this act. The proceeding shall be commenced by filing with the clerk of the court where the conviction occurred a petition verified by affidavit. A copy of the petition shall be served by the inmate on the Wyoming attorney general by mail or by some other method reasonably calculated to assure prompt and verifiable service. The clerk shall docket the petition upon receipt and bring it promptly to the attention of the court.

Unless otherwise inconsistent with the provisions of this act, proceedings under this act shall be conducted pursuant to the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure and the Wyoming Rules of Evidence, except:

Any evidentiary hearing shall be conducted before the court without a jury; and

Rules 3, 4, 14, 22, 23, 24, 38, 39, 40.1, 42, 47, 48, 51, 55, 59 and 64 through 71.1 of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure shall not apply to proceedings under this act.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 63, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-408.1; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1988, ch. 46, § 1; 2018 ch. 77, § 2, effective March 12, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

in (b), inserted “or
sentence” following “his conviction” in the first
sentence, and substituted “by mail or by some other method
reasonably calculated to assure prompt and verifiable service”
for “by certified or registered mail.”

Laws 2018,
ch. 77, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art.
4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2018.

Cross references. —

As to attorney general, see §

9-1-601

et seq.

For the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure and Wyoming Rules of Evidence, see the

Wyoming Court Rules Annotated.

Hearing not required in every case. —

This section merely permits the court to hold an evidentiary hearing in the event it deems a hearing is necessary; the statute does not require that a hearing be held in every case. Smizer v. State, 835 P.2d 334,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1992).

An evidentiary hearing is necessary

when the court cannot adequately review the issues by relying upon the record alone. Smizer v. State, 835 P.2d 334,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1992).

District court without jurisdiction to hear appeal. —

Except where there has been a remand following an appeal in a criminal case, or where one of the statutes or rules, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-27-101

et seq., Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-14-101

through

7-14-108

, Wyo. R. Crim. P. 35, otherwise expressly permits a district court to continue to assert jurisdiction over that criminal case, no authority exists for the district court to act in the case and its jurisdiction over the case should end. Barela v. State, 2002 WY 143, 55 P.3d 11,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 2002).

Remedy of post-conviction relief is afforded to persons imprisoned in penitentiary.

Therefore, since appellant was not imprisoned in the penitentiary at the time of filing his petition nor was he in constructive custody of the state of Wyoming, he having been discharged from probation, the district court was without jurisdiction under the post-conviction relief statute to entertain or decide appellant's petition. Diefenderfer v. State, 745 P.2d 556,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 535

(Wyo. 1987).

Section does not afford relief from alleged errors for which remedies were available

before and during the original trial. Johnson v. State, 592 P.2d 285,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 383

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 442 U.S. 932, 99 S. Ct. 2864, 61 L. Ed. 2d 300, 1979 U.S. LEXIS 2095 (U.S. 1979).

Post-conviction petition not appeal substitute. —

This section does not give a defendant the right to have the case tried over and may not be employed as a substitute for an appeal. Johnson v. State, 592 P.2d 285,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 383

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 442 U.S. 932, 99 S. Ct. 2864, 61 L. Ed. 2d 300, 1979 U.S. LEXIS 2095 (U.S. 1979).

Applicability to sentencing proceeding. —

Inmate's claim on his petition seeking postconviction relief that he was prejudiced pursuant to W.R.E. 404(b) by admission of evidence concerning his prior crimes, including victim impact evidence as to those crimes, during the sentencing phase of his trial was waived under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-14-103(a)(i) when it was not raised on direct appeal. Furthermore, this section clearly confines the state supreme court's role under the post-conviction relief act to those proceedings that resulted in a conviction, and not to sentencing proceedings. Harlow v. State, 2005 WY 12, 105 P.3d 1049,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 546 U.S. 835, 126 S. Ct. 63, 163 L. Ed. 2d 90, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 6229 (U.S. 2005).

Appropriate double jeopardy remedy. —

A motion under Rule 35(a), W.R.Cr.P. is not the proper remedy by which to assert a violation of double jeopardy protections. Upon exhaustion of the right to directly appeal from conviction, post-conviction relief provided in §§

7-14-101

through

7-14-108

is the only proper method of gaining relief on a double jeopardy claim. Birr v. State, 878 P.2d 515,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1994).

Appeal proper remedy for irregularities evident in record. —

Where the issues raised by appellant relate only to claimed irregularities at trial are not of constitutional dimensions, they are matters which are evident in the record and which could and should have been raised in an appeal. Munoz v. Maschner, 590 P.2d 1352,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 375

(Wyo. 1979).

Claim that defendant charged with wrong offense not properly raised. —

A defendant's claim that he should have been charged with unauthorized use of an automobile, and not felony larceny, was not properly raised in a proceeding for post-conviction relief. Such a claim should have been raised in a direct appeal from his conviction. Morgan v. State, 708 P.2d 1244,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 606

(Wyo. 1985).

Failure to raise on appeal issue that sentence was disproportionate to crimes

for which defendant was convicted is a bar to its being raised in a post-conviction relief proceeding. Pote v. State, 733 P.2d 1018,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 406

(Wyo. 1987).

Failure to file direct appeal did not bar petition. —

Issues not raised on direct appeal, generally, would have been procedurally defaulted pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-14-103(a)(i), however, a district court abrogated its duty to protect petitioner's right to appeal by failing to advise him of his right to appeal his conviction as mandated by Wyo. R. Crim. P. 32(c)(3); thus, where the court undermined petitioner's ability to take a timely direct appeal, petitioner's failure to appeal could not be relied upon as grounds for summarily dismissing his petition for post-conviction relief pursuant to this section.
Hauck v. State, 2007 WY 113, 162 P.3d 512,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 2007).

Constitutional issues relating to guilt were cognizable. —

Issue whether petitioner was given appropriate credit on his sentence for time served was not cognizable in a post-conviction relief action pursuant to this section; however, petitioner's other claims fell outside the scope of § 7-14-101(b), and his challenges to his competency, his Sixth Amendment right to counsel, the use of restraints at trial, and prosecutorial misconduct all implicated constitutional protections. were related to the finding of guilt, and thus were to be considered on remand.
Hauck v. State, 2007 WY 113, 162 P.3d 512,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 2007).

Post-conviction relief will be granted only in extraordinary circumstances

where there is a likelihood that without some deprivation of constitutional rights the defendant would not have been found guilty, and the probability of a miscarriage of justice is strong. Johnson v. State, 592 P.2d 285,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 383

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 442 U.S. 932, 99 S. Ct. 2864, 61 L. Ed. 2d 300, 1979 U.S. LEXIS 2095 (U.S. 1979); Hoggatt v. State, 606 P.2d 718,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 237

(Wyo. 1980).

Post-conviction relief is an extraordinary authorization to seek relief under circumstances which suggest a “miscarriage of justice.” The substance of a fair trial must be missing in order to justify its application. Murray v. State, 776 P.2d 206,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1989).

Nolo contendere plea. —

The defendant, who pleaded nolo contendere to charges of obtaining money by false pretenses and with intent to defraud, and who failed to present any claims for post-conviction relief which raised any jurisdictional defects, had no viable claim for relief in post-conviction proceedings. Martin v. State, 780 P.2d 1354,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 210

(Wyo. 1989).

Plea withdrawals. —

Where defendant entered nolo contendere pleas to operating an unlawful clandestine laboratory operation and possession of a controlled substance, the state failed to uphold the provision in the plea agreement promising that defendant would not be charged with federal firearms crimes; because the sentence and judgment had already been imposed, the district court had no jurisdiction over defendant's motion to withdraw his guilty plea, and the proper avenue for presenting a challenge to defendant's conviction was by way of post-conviction relief under this section.
Brown v. State, 2008 WY 9, 175 P.3d 1158,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 2008).

Plea agreement procedure. —

A petition for post-conviction relief was properly dismissed, where, although the trial court did not comply with Rule 11(e), W.R.Cr.P. (plea agreement procedure), at a change of plea proceeding, the court discharged its constitutional obligations and duties to the accused. Gist v. State, 768 P.2d 1054,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 1989).

Scope of inquiry. —

The inquiry under this section is limited to a determination of whether or not the defendant was denied the right to be represented by counsel, to have witnesses and to have a fair opportunity to prepare and present his defense. Johnson v. State, 592 P.2d 285,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 383

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 442 U.S. 932, 99 S. Ct. 2864, 61 L. Ed. 2d 300, 1979 U.S. LEXIS 2095 (U.S. 1979).

Stand-alone claim of ineffective assistance of appellate counsel is not cognizable under this section because post-conviction relief is limited to the alleged denial of constitutional rights during the proceedings which resulted in conviction.
Schreibvogel v. State, 2012 WY 15, 269 P.3d 1098,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2012).

Unconstitutional sentencing. —

A claimed constitutional error concerning sentencing cannot be reached under Wyoming post-conviction relief statutes, since the violation does not occur in the proceeding that resulted in defendant's conviction. Whitney v. State, 745 P.2d 902,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 538

(Wyo. 1987).

Claim that convict's sentence is illegal cannot be raised

in a proceeding initiated pursuant to this chapter. Schuler v. State, 771 P.2d 1217,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1989).

No error in acceptance of Alford plea. —

There was no abuse of discretion in the district court's implicit finding that defendant failed to show any error in the court's acceptance of his Alford plea, let alone manifest injustice. Duran v. State, 949 P.2d 885,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 1997).

Claim of ineffective assistance of counsel. —

Defendant's claim of ineffective assistance of his appellate counsel, for failure to raise the issue of ineffective assistance of his trial counsel, requires that an evidentiary hearing be held to determine whether his trial counsel rendered effective representation. Smizer v. State, 835 P.2d 334,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1992).

Where a claim of ineffective assistance of counsel has been raised and decided against the appellant in his direct appeal, he may not raise a claim of ineffective assistance of counsel, based upon different allegations, in a petition for post-conviction relief because the claim is procedurally barred by this section. Therefore, a trial court did not err by dismissing a post-conviction relief petition where different allegations of ineffective assistance of counsel were raised on direct appeal and in the post-conviction petition.
Schreibvogel v. State, 2012 WY 15, 269 P.3d 1098,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2012).

Petitioner must present substantial claim with some specificity. —

Before a person seeking post conviction relief is entitled to an evidentiary hearing, he must present initially a substantial claim, and some specificity is required. Boggs v. State, 484 P.2d 711,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 216

(Wyo. 1971).

Petition to be supported by something more than “information and belief.” —

A petition for post-conviction relief had to be supported by affidavits based on something more solid than “information and belief.” The court was justified in calling upon the petitioner to set out facts under oath to show how he could prove his allegations before granting an evidentiary hearing. State ex rel. Hopkinson v. District Court, 696 P.2d 54,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 455

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 474 U.S. 865, 106 S. Ct. 187, 88 L. Ed. 2d 155, 1985 U.S. LEXIS 4988 (U.S. 1985).

Application is properly denied without hearing where it states only bald legal conclusions

with no supporting factual allegations. Boggs v. State, 484 P.2d 711,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 216

(Wyo. 1971).

In case where allegations of petition consisted principally of bald legal conclusions sans specificity, court properly denied petition after considering only the court file. Bibbins v. State, 696 P.2d 1300,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 464

(Wyo. 1985).

But better practice to permit amendment of petition. —

Where there are insufficient factual allegations in support of an application to warrant an evidentiary hearing, it is usually better practice to permit the petitioner to amend his petition than to dismiss it. Boggs v. State, 484 P.2d 711,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 216

(Wyo. 1971).

Petitioner's burden of proof. —

A petitioner seeking post-conviction relief has the burden of showing that he has been denied constitutional safeguards. Munoz v. Maschner, 590 P.2d 1352,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 375

(Wyo. 1979); Hoggatt v. State, 606 P.2d 718,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 237

(Wyo. 1980).

Where the error complained of in a post-conviction proceeding is characterized as a violation of procedural due process, a showing must be made by the petitioner that a protected liberty has been affected. Hoggatt v. State, 606 P.2d 718,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 237

(Wyo. 1980).

Proper motion for dismissal. —

A post conviction action was properly dismissed on motion reciting: (1) the petition failed to state a cause of action, and (2) all issues presented had been raised on an appeal to the supreme court and fully adjudicated. Kennedy v. State, 443 P.2d 138,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 1968).

Statutory five-year limitation is flexible

and gives petitioner relief where he “alleges facts showing that the delay was not due to his own neglect.” Opie v. Meacham, 293 F. Supp. 647, 1968 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 8113 (D. Wyo. 1968), aff'd, 419 F.2d 465, 1969 U.S. App. LEXIS 9653 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1969).

Claims alleging a violation of double jeopardy

are not cognizable under the language of Rule 35, W.R.Cr.P. Instead, such challenges must be brought as a petition for post-conviction relief under this chapter. Parker v. State, 882 P.2d 1225,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 1994).

Applied

in

Owens v. State, 398 P.2d 556,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1965); Teton v. State, 482 P.2d 123,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1971); Collingwood v. State, 493 P.2d 1048,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1972).

Quoted

in

Opie v. Meacham, 419 F.2d 465,

1969 U.S. App. LEXIS 9653

(10th Cir. 1969); Albert v. State, 466 P.2d 826,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1970); York v. State, 619 P.2d 391,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 321

(Wyo. 1980); Alberts v. State, 745 P.2d 898,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 539

(Wyo. 1987); Osborn v. Shillinger, 861 F.2d 612,

1988 U.S. App. LEXIS 14834

(10th Cir. 1988).

Stated

in

Boyd v. State, 747 P.2d 1143,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 573

(Wyo. 1987); Parkhurst v. Shillinger, 128 F.3d 1366,

1997 U.S. App. LEXIS 29095

(10th Cir. 1997).

Cited

in

Albert v. Meacham, 458 P.2d 728,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 158

, 41 A.L.R.3d 1115 (Wyo. 1969); Cox v. State, 494 P.2d 541,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 232

(Wyo. 1972); Fondren v. State, 749 P.2d 767 (Wyo. 1988); Smith v. State, 902 P.2d 1271,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1995); Weldon v. Wyoming Dep't of Cors., 963 F. Supp. 1098, 1997 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6606 (D. Wyo. 1997); Harlow v. State, 2003 WY 69, — P.3d —,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. May 29, 2003); Amin v. State, 2006 WY 84, 138 P.3d 1143,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(2006); Smith v. State, 2008 WY 98, 190 P.3d 522,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Aug. 19, 2008); Neidlinger v. State, 2010 WY 54, 230 P.3d 306,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Apr. 27, 2010); Stanton v. Wyoming Ag, — F.3d —,

2010 U.S. App. LEXIS 21199

(Oct. 14, 2010).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Post Conviction Remedies,” see XIX Wyo. L.J. 213 (1965).

For comment, “Disqualification of District Judges in Wyoming: An Assessment of the Revised Rules,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 655 (1984).

§ 7-14-102.
Contents of petition.

The petition shall state:

The proceeding in which the petitioner was convicted;

The date of the rendition of the final judgment;

The facts which show the petitioner’s constitutional rights were violated; and

Any previous proceedings in which the petitioner has been involved to secure relief from his conviction.

The petition shall be accompanied by affidavits, records or other evidence supporting the allegations or shall state why the same are not attached.

The petition may contain argument, citations and discussion of authorities.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 63, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 7-408.2; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Supporting documents required to create entitlement to evidentiaryhearing. —

A petition for post-conviction relief was a continuation of the criminal case and not a civil action, and it was not appropriate to apply the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure to the extent urged. Specifically, the filing of the petition was not, in itself, sufficient to create entitlement to an evidentiary hearing; supporting documents were required to be attached. State ex rel. Hopkinson v. District Court, 696 P.2d 54,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 455

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 474 U.S. 865, 106 S. Ct. 187, 88 L. Ed. 2d 155, 1985 U.S. LEXIS 4988 (U.S. 1985).

And affidavits to be supported by something more than “informationand belief.” —

A petition for post-conviction relief had to be supported by affidavits based on something more solid than “information and belief.” The court was justified in calling upon the petitioner to set out facts under oath to show how he could prove his allegations before granting an evidentiary hearing. State ex rel. Hopkinson v. District Court, 696 P.2d 54,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 455

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 474 U.S. 865, 106 S. Ct. 187, 88 L. Ed. 2d 155, 1985 U.S. LEXIS 4988 (U.S. 1985).

Applied

in

Pote v. State, 733 P.2d 1018,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 406

(Wyo. 1987); Stogner v. State, 792 P.2d 1358,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1990).

Quoted

in

Long v. State, 745 P.2d 547,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 542

(Wyo. 1987); Osborn v. Shillinger, 861 F.2d 612,

1988 U.S. App. LEXIS 14834

(10th Cir. 1988).

Cited

in

Harlow v. State, 2005 WY 12, 105 P.3d 1049,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(2005).

Relationship to Rule 56. —

District court did not err in granting summary judgment to the State without holding an evidentiary hearing on petitioner’s post-conviction claim of juror misconduct where the State objected to an affidavit because it contained only inadmissible hearsay, petitioner did not submit any additional evidence in response, and per Wyo. R. Civ. P. 56, petitioner had the tools to assist him in surmounting any obstacles to meeting his burden on summary judgment. Harnetty v. State, 2022 WY 68, 511 P.3d 165,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 2022).

§ 7-14-103.
Claims barred; applicability of act.

A claim under this act is procedurally barred and no court has jurisdiction to decide the claim if the claim:

Could have been raised but was not raised in a direct appeal from the proceeding which resulted in the petitioner’s conviction;

Was not raised in the original or an amendment to the original petition under this act; or

Was decided on its merits or on procedural grounds in any previous proceeding which has become final.

Notwithstanding paragraph (a)(i) of this section, a court may hear a petition based on any of the following:

The petitioner sets forth facts supported by affidavits or other credible evidence which was not known or reasonably available to him at the time of a direct appeal;

The court finds from a review of the trial and appellate records that the petitioner’s appellate counsel provided constitutionally ineffective assistance by failing to assert a claim that was likely to result in a reversal of the petitioner’s conviction or sentence on his direct appeal. This finding may be reviewed by the supreme court together with any further action of the district court taken on the petition; or

The petitioner was represented by the same attorney in the trial and appellate courts.

This act does not apply to claims of error or denial of rights in any proceeding:

For the revocation of probation or parole;

Provided by statute or court rule for new trial, sentence reduction, sentence correction or other post-verdict motion.

No petition under this act shall be allowed if filed more than five (5) years after the judgment of conviction was entered.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 63, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 7-408.3; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1988, ch. 46, § 1; 1989, ch. 17, § 1; 2018 ch. 77, § 2, effective March 12, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

in (b), substituted “petition based on any of the following”
for “petition if”; in (b)(ii), rewrote the first sentence,
which read: “The court makes a finding that the petitioner
was denied constitutionally effective assistance of counsel on his
direct appeal”; added (b)(iii); and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2018,
ch. 77, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art.
4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2018.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-14-101(a).

Issues not decided, but not raised, barred. —

Any issues which were not previously decided, but which were not raised in a previous petition, were barred by this section or were not properly matters for consideration under a Rule 35(a), W.R.Cr.P. motion to correct an illegal sentence. Brown v. State, 894 P.2d 597,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1995).

Claim of ineffective assistance of counsel. —

Defendant's claim of ineffective assistance of his appellate counsel, for failure to raise the issue of ineffective assistance of his trial counsel, requires that an evidentiary hearing be held to determine whether his trial counsel rendered effective representation. Smizer v. State, 835 P.2d 334,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1992).

In a
28 U.S.C.S. § 2254 case in which a pro se state inmate asserted that he
was eligible for equitable tolling, the Martinez decision, which applied
Arizona law, was distinguishable. Unlike Arizona, Wyoming did not
prohibit a defendant from bringing an ineffective assistance claim
on direct appeal.
2013 U.S. App. LEXIS 9749.

Ineffective assistance claim procedurally barred. —

Issues raised by the petitioner and phrased in terms of constitutional infirmities, based on a theme of ineffective assistance of trial counsel, were procedurally barred. Amin v. State, 774 P.2d 597,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 1989).

Unpublished decision:

Because petitioner failed to demonstrate “cause” for the procedural default in state court of his ineffective assistance of counsel claim (petitioner's argument that nothing in the cold trial record would have indicated to the appellate counsel that the trial counsel had not investigated the defendant's mental deficiencies was waived because he had not raised it before the district court), reasonable jurists could not have debated the correctness of the district court's decision to dismiss the claim as procedurally barred.
Rawle v. Wyo. Dep't of Corr. State Penitentiary Warden, 390 Fed. Appx. 769, 2010 U.S. App. LEXIS 16285 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2010).

Petitioner's claims that he was denied his sixth amendment right to have compulsory process for obtaining witnesses and that he had ineffective assistance of counsel were procedurally barred, where the issues were presented to the district court with the aid of appointed counsel who was not the same attorney that assisted petitioner in either his trial or in his direct appeal. Campbell v. State, 772 P.2d 543,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 1989).

Where prior sexual conduct evidence was held inadmissible due to remoteness as well as untimeliness, and the defendant's counsel stated an experienced investigator had been used to inquire into the victim's background but was unable to uncover any evidence of prostitution, evidence that the defendant claimed existed, the defendant failed to demonstrate facts which occurred at his trial that supported his claim of ineffective assistance of counsel, or that counsel improperly failed to raise errors made at trial. Stogner v. State, 792 P.2d 1358,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1990).

Petitioner's failure to raise his claim of ineffective assistance of appellate counsel in his state postconviction petition within the time required by this section procedurally defaulted that claim, and a federal court would not entertain that claim. Parkhurst v. Shillinger, 128 F.3d 1366, 1997 U.S. App. LEXIS 29095 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1997).

Where a claim of ineffective assistance of counsel has been raised and decided against the appellant in his direct appeal, he may not raise a claim of ineffective assistance of counsel, based upon different allegations, in a petition for post-conviction relief because the claim is procedurally barred by this section. Therefore, a trial court did not err by dismissing a post-conviction relief petition where different allegations of ineffective assistance of counsel were raised on direct appeal and in the post-conviction petition.
Schreibvogel v. State, 2012 WY 15, 269 P.3d 1098,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2012).

Jurisdictional exception for the consideration of ineffective assistance of appellate counsel provided in this section is limited to situations where a claim could have been raised but was not raised in the direct appeal, as addressed by this section.
Schreibvogel v. State, 2012 WY 15, 269 P.3d 1098,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2012).

Stand-alone claim of ineffective assistance of appellate counsel is not cognizable under this section because post-conviction relief is limited to the alleged denial of constitutional rights during the proceedings which resulted in conviction.
Schreibvogel v. State, 2012 WY 15, 269 P.3d 1098,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2012).

Ineffective assistance claim not procedurally barred. —

Petitioner's ineffective assistance of counsel claim was not procedurally barred from being raised for the first time on a petition for post-conviction review because he was represented by the same law firm at both trial and on appeal, and therefore the petitioner did not truly have an opportunity to make an ineffective assistance of trial counsel claim on direct appeal. Keats v. State, 2005 WY 81, 115 P.3d 1110,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 2005).

Issues not procedurally barred where right to appeal was compromised. —

Issues not raised on direct appeal, generally, would have been procedurally defaulted pursuant to this section, however, a district court abrogated its duty to protect petitioner's right to appeal by failing to advise him of his right to appeal his conviction as mandated by Wyo. R. Crim. P. 32(c)(3); thus, where the court undermined petitioner's ability to take a timely direct appeal, petitioner's failure to appeal could not be relied upon as grounds for summarily dismissing his petition for post-conviction relief pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-14-101(b).
Hauck v. State, 2007 WY 113, 162 P.3d 512,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 2007).

Second petition raising same issues not considered. —

Since issues raised in the most recent petition which were heard in the first postconviction proceeding are res judicata, petitioner is not entitled to have a second postconviction petition considered. Bibbins v. State, 741 P.2d 115,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 492

(Wyo. 1987).

Decided issues may not be relitigated. —

Motion to correct an illegal sentence did not permit a defendant to relitigate an issue which had already been considered and decided as those issues were governed by the law of the case and could not be raised in subsequent motions under Wyo. R. Crim. P. 35(a). Accordingly, the district court did not err in denying defendant relief. Brown v. State, 2004 WY 119, 99 P.3d 489,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 2004), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. Nov. 16, 2004), cert. denied, 544 U.S. 966, 125 S. Ct. 1743, 161 L. Ed. 2d 612, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 3057 (U.S. 2005).

Claims not raised on direct appeal waived. —

Inmate's claim on his petition seeking postconviction relief that he was prejudiced pursuant to W.R.E. 404(b) by admission of evidence concerning his prior crimes, including victim impact evidence as to those crimes, during the sentencing phase of his trial was waived under this section when it was not raised on direct appeal. Furthermore, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-14-101(b) clearly confines the state supreme court's role under the post-conviction relief act to those proceedings that resulted in a conviction, and not to sentencing proceedings. Harlow v. State, 2005 WY 12, 105 P.3d 1049,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 546 U.S. 835, 126 S. Ct. 63, 163 L. Ed. 2d 90, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 6229 (U.S. 2005).

Because Wyoming applies a procedural bar to claims that could have been raised on direct appeal but were not, pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-14-103(a), the United States Court of Appeals for the Tenth Circuit can reach such a claim's merits only if a habeas petitioner demonstrates cause and prejudice or a fundamental miscarriage of justice.
Belden v. Wyo. Dep't of Corr., 251 Fed. Appx. 512,

2007 U.S. App. LEXIS 24249

(10th Cir. Wyo. 2007), cert. denied, 552 U.S. 1281, 128 S. Ct. 1733, 170 L. Ed. 2d 516, 2008 U.S. LEXIS 2905 (U.S. 2008).

Where defendant did not raise all constitutional claims in first postconviction petition,

did not seek to amend that petition before it was ruled upon and, after its denial, did not appeal, the issues raised in that petition were res judicata and a second postconviction petition would not be allowed. Boyd v. State, 747 P.2d 1143,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 573

(Wyo. 1987).

Statute of limitations provision not unconstitutional. —

Five-year statute of limitations contained in this section did not violate equal protection clause of United States Constitution, and state relied upon an adequate state ground to establish defendant's procedural default. Phillips v. Ferguson, 182 F.3d 769, 1999 U.S. App. LEXIS 14908 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1999).

Untimeliness of petition barred consideration. —

Even if a former inmate's pro se “petition to show cause why judgment was not void '' were to be construed as a motion for postconviction relief, the former inmate was too late in the request, where the former inmate filed the petition more than five years after he had been convicted. Taylor v. State, 2003 WY 97, 74 P.3d 1236,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 2003).

Without any facts to indicate that the inmate could have filed a viable petition for post-conviction relief, the supreme court could not determine that the inmate had been injured by the expiration of the applicable statute of limitations under this section; thus, the inmate's complaint was properly dismissed as he did not allege an actual injury.
Belden v. Lampert, 2011 WY 83, 251 P.3d 325,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 2011).

Applied

in

Boggs v. State, 484 P.2d 711,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 216

(Wyo. 1971); Murray v. State, 776 P.2d 206,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1989); Swazo v. Shillinger, 932 F. Supp. 1350, 1996 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16694 (D. Wyo. 1996).

Quoted

in

Aden v. State, 761 P.2d 88,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1988); Hamill v. Ferguson, 937 F. Supp. 1517, 1996 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 17115 (D. Wyo. 1996); Heinemann v. Murphy,
401 Fed. App. 304,

2010 U.S. App. LEXIS 21014

(Oct. 12, 2010).

Stated

in

Neidlinger v. State, 2010 WY 54, 230 P.3d 306,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Apr. 27, 2010).

Cited

in

Kallas v. State, 776 P.2d 198,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1989); Weldon v. Wyoming Dep't of Cors., 963 F. Supp. 1098, 1997 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6606 (D. Wyo. 1997); Hamill v. State, 948 P.2d 1356,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1997); Rathbun v. State, 2011 WY 116, 257 P.3d 29,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Aug. 8, 2011).

§ 7-14-104.
No right to appointed counsel.

and (b) Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 95, § 2.

An indigent petitioner seeking relief under this act is not entitled to representation by the state public defender or by appointed counsel.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 63, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 7-408.4; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; ch. 176, § 1; 1988, ch. 46, § 1; 1990, ch. 95, §§ 1, 2.

Cross references. —

As to right to assignment of counsel, see Rule 44, W.R. Cr. P.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (c), see § 7-14-101(a).

Stated

in

State ex rel. Hopkinson v. District Court, 696 P.2d 54,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 455

(Wyo. 1985); Cutbirth v. State, 751 P.2d 1257,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

Keats v. State, 2005 WY 81, 115 P.3d 1110,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(2005).

§ 7-14-105.
Answer by state; withdrawal of petition; amendments and further pleadings.

Within forty-five (45) days after being ordered to respond to the petition by the court, or within any further time as the court may fix, the attorney general on behalf of the state shall answer or move to dismiss the petition. No other or further pleadings shall be filed except as the court may order on its own motion or on that of either party.

The court may grant leave to the petitioner, at any stage of the proceeding prior to entry of judgment, to withdraw the petition.

The court may by order authorize:

Amendment of the petition or any other pleadings;

The filing of further pleadings; or

An extension of the time for filing any further pleading other than the original petition.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 63, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 7-408.5; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 2018 ch. 77, § 2, effective March 12, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

in (a), substituted “Within forty-five (45) days after being
ordered to respond to the petition by the court, or” for “Within
thirty (30) days after filing the petition, or.”

Laws 2018,
ch. 77, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art.
4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2018.

Cross references. —

As to enlargement of time, see Rule 6(b), W.R.C.P.

As to additional pleadings, see Rule 7(a), W.R.C.P.

As to amended and supplemental pleadings, see Rule 15, W.R.C.P.

Where defendant did not raise all constitutional claims in first post-conviction petition,

did not seek to amend that petition before it was ruled upon and, after its denial, did not appeal, the issues raised in that petition were res judicata and a second post-conviction petition would not be allowed. Boyd v. State, 747 P.2d 1143,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 573

(Wyo. 1987).

Quoted

in

Schuler v. State, 771 P.2d 1217,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1989).

Cited

in

Fondren v. State, 749 P.2d 767 (Wyo. 1988).

§ 7-14-106.
Evidence received by court; orders entered upon favorable finding; contents of final judgment or order.

The court may, if it determines it to be necessary, receive proof by affidavits, deposition, oral testimony or other evidence and may order the petitioner brought before the court for the hearing.

If the court finds in favor of the petitioner, it shall enter an appropriate order with respect to the judgment or sentence in the former proceedings and any supplementary orders as to rearraignment, retrial, custody, bail or discharge as may be necessary and proper.

The final judgment or order on a petition under this act shall state the basis for the court’s decision and may contain findings of fact and conclusions of law.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 63, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 7-408.6; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1988, ch. 46, § 1.

Cross references. —

For Wyoming Rules of Evidence, see the

Wyoming Court Rules Annotated.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-14-101(a).

In appropriate cases court may act on petition, considering only court file.

This chapter does not mandate a formal hearing nor does it require that a petitioner be brought back into court for a hearing, nor that oral testimony, depositions, affidavits or other evidence be produced; these depend on the circumstances of each case. Bibbins v. State, 696 P.2d 1300,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 464

(Wyo. 1985).

There was no abuse of discretion in holding of post-conviction hearing without the defendant being physically present, where relief was resolved on the files and records in the trial court. Matlack v. State, 695 P.2d 635,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 448

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 472 U.S. 1030, 105 S. Ct. 3508, 87 L. Ed. 2d 638, 1985 U.S. LEXIS 2327 (U.S. 1985).

Evidentiary hearing not required. —

The trial judge did not abuse his discretion by not affording defendant an evidentiary hearing since defendant's petition was comprised of naked allegations and conclusions unsupported by depositions or affidavits and defendant did not explain how his allegations could be proven. Pote v. State, 733 P.2d 1018,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 406

(Wyo. 1987).

Applied

in

State ex rel. Hopkinson v. District Court, 696 P.2d 54,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 455

(Wyo. 1985).